District of Columbia statutes.
16-4603.12

Costs, fees, and expenses.

(a)

The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney’s fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses, and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

(b)

The court may not assess fees, costs, or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this chapter.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-293, § 2(d), 48 DCR 2214
This section is referenced in § 16-4603.08 and § 16-4603.10.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 312 of the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act (1997 Act).